South Dakota, session 2026, SB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 5-18B:
Any contract for a public improvement between a contractor and a purchasing
agency, as those terms are defined in § 5-18A-1, must contain a provision authorizing the
purchasing agency to:
(1) Verify that the contractor has obtained workers' compensation insurance, as
provided in title 62, prior to the commencement of any contracted service and
whether, under the worker's compensation insurance policy, the contractor's
estimated payroll is zero; and
(2) Monitor the status of the contractor's workers' compensation insurance coverage
during the pendency of the contract by requesting that the contractor provide:
(a) Documentation showing the contractor's payment of workers' compensation
insurance premiums;
(b) A list of all subcontractors involved with the public improvement;
(c) Payroll records of the contractor's employees and any subcontractor's
employees involved with the public improvement; and
(d) Any other information deemed necessary by the purchasing agency to
prevent the occurrence of workers' compensation fraud in connection with
the public improvement.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 5-18B:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

86C 2 86
If a contractor or a subcontractor fails to comply with any provision of a contract
for public improvement, which is required by this chapter, the purchasing agency may
terminate the contract for cause, recover any damages arising from the noncompliance,
and replace the contractor or subcontractor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.